Hawaii statutes.
[§556A-6] Procedure for disclosing digital
assets. (a) When disclosing digital assets of a user under this chapter,
the custodian may at its sole discretion:

(1) Grant a fiduciary or designated recipient full
access to the user's account;

(2) Grant a fiduciary or designated recipient partial
access to the user's account sufficient to perform the tasks with which the
fiduciary or designated recipient is charged; or

(3) Provide a fiduciary or designated recipient a
copy in a record of any digital asset that, on the date the custodian received
the request for disclosure, the user could have accessed if the user were alive
and had full capacity and access to the account.

(b) A custodian may assess a reasonable
administrative charge for the cost of disclosing digital assets under this
chapter.

(c) A custodian need not disclose under this
chapter a digital asset deleted by a user.

(d) If a user directs or a fiduciary requests
a custodian to disclose under this chapter some, but not all, of the user's digital
assets, the custodian need not disclose the assets if segregation of the assets
would impose an undue burden on the custodian. If the custodian believes the
direction or request imposes an undue burden, the custodian or fiduciary may
seek an order from the court to disclose:

(1) A subset limited by date of the user's digital
assets;

(2) All of the user's digital assets to the fiduciary
or designated recipient;

(3) None of the user's digital assets; or

(4) All of the user's digital assets to the court for
review in camera. [L 2016, c 162, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next